Montana, session 2025, HB455.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 13-37-126, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-37-126. Names not to appear on ballot -- statewide initiative not to appear on ballot. (1) The
name of a candidate may not appear on the official ballot for an election if the candidate or a treasurer for a
candidate fails to file any statement or report as required by 2-2-106 or this chapter.
(2) A vacancy on an official ballot under subsection (1) may be filled in the manner provided by
law, but not by the same candidate.
(3) A statewide initiative may not appear on the official ballot for an election if the treasurer for the
primary ballot committee supporting the statewide initiative fails to file any report as required by this chapter.
(4) A vacancy on an official ballot under subsection (3) may not be filled.
(5) (a) In carrying out the mandate of this section, the commissioner shall, by a written statement,
notify the secretary of state and the election administrator conducting an election when a candidate or a
candidate's treasurer has not complied with 2-2-106 or when a candidate or candidate's treasurer or the
treasurer for the primary ballot committee supporting a statewide initiative has not complied with the provisions
of this chapter and that the candidate's name or the statewide initiative may not appear on the official ballot.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c), the commissioner shall provide the notification:
(i) 2 calendar days before the certification deadline provided in 13-10-208 for statewide primary
elections and 20-20-401 for school district elections; and
(ii) 7 days before the certification deadline provided in 13-12-201 for general elections.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 455
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 455
(c) (i) (i) For a municipal primary election ,, the commissioner shall provide the notification no later
than 5 days after the candidate filing deadline.
(ii) For a municipal general election, the commissioner shall provide the notification no later than
September 30 or, if September 30 falls on a Saturday or Sunday, no later than the preceding Friday.
(ii) For a municipal general election, the commissioner shall provide the notification no later than
September 24 or, if September 24 falls on a Saturday or Sunday, no later than the preceding Friday."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
Section 3. Applicability. [This act] applies to all municipal primary elections and municipal general
elections held on or after April 20, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 455
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 455, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 455
INTRODUCED BY J. DARLING
AN ACT UPDATING THE COMMISSIONER OF POLITICAL PRACTICES DEADLINE TO CERTIFY POLITICAL
CANDIDATES FOR MUNICIPAL RACES; AMENDING SECTION 13-37-126, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN
IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE AND AN APPLICABILITY DATE.”